Hawaii statutes.
§501-30 Additional facts. The rules of
court may require facts to be stated in the application in addition to those
prescribed by this chapter, and not inconsistent therewith, and may require the
filing of any additional papers. [L 1903, c 56, §28; RL 1925, §3217; RL 1935,
§5021; RL 1945, §12621; RL 1955, §342-22; HRS §501-30; am L 1972, c 91, §1(g)]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next